Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 2. Utility Aggregation Cooperatives Act.

§ 56-231.38.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Affiliate” means a separate affiliated or subsidiary corporation or other separate legal entity.

“Board” means any board of directors of a cooperative formed under or which becomes subject to this article.

“Commission” means the State Corporation Commission of Virginia.

“Cooperative” means a power supply cooperative formed under the former Power Supply Cooperatives Act (§ 56-231.1 et seq.) or a utility aggregation cooperative formed under this article or which becomes subject to this article.

“Energy” means and includes all energy, regardless of how or where it is generated or produced.

“HVACR” means heating, ventilation, air conditioning and refrigeration.

“Member” means any person that holds any class of membership in a cooperative.

“Obligations” means all evidences of indebtedness issued by or the payment of which is assumed by a cooperative.

“Patronage capital” includes all amounts received by a cooperative from the sale of electric power to members in excess of the cooperative’s cost of furnishing electric power to members and such other margins as determined by the Board.

“Person” means and includes natural persons, firms, associations, cooperatives, corporations, limited liability companies, business trusts, partnerships, limited liability partnerships and bodies politic.

“Propane or fuel oil equipment” means equipment and related systems to store or use propane or fuel oil products.

“Regulated utility services” means utility services that are subject to regulation as to rates or service by the Commission.

“System” means any plant, works, facility, or property used or useful in connection with the purchase, generation, sale or transmission of energy, utility products and services, or both.

“Traditional cooperative activity” means any business, service or activity in which cooperatives in Virginia have traditionally engaged and that is incidental to and substantially related to the electric utility business conducted by a cooperative on
or before July 1, 1999; provided, however, that traditional cooperative activity does not include any program to (i) buy or maintain an inventory of HVACR equipment or household appliances; (ii) install or service any such equipment
or household appliances for customers, unless such service is not provided by the cooperative but by a third party individual, firm or corporation licensed to perform such service; (iii) sell HVACR equipment or household appliances
to customers metered and billed on residential rates; (iv) sell HVACR equipment to customers other than those metered and billed on residential rates except where such sale is an incidental part of providing other energy services or
providing other traditional cooperative activities; (v) sell or distribute propane or fuel oil; sell, install or service propane or fuel oil equipment; or maintain or buy an inventory of propane or fuel oil equipment for resale; or
(vi) serve as a coordinator of nonelectric energy services or provide engineering consulting services except when such energy or engineering services are an incidental part of a marketing effort to provide other energy or engineering
services or as a part of providing services that are other traditional cooperative activities.

“Utility services” means any products, services, and equipment related to energy, telecommunications, water and sewerage.

History.
1999, c. 874; 2000, cc. 944, 964, 989, 999.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 944 and 999 are identical, and added the language beginning “and such other” at the end of the paragraph defining “Patronage capital”; and added the paragraph defining “Traditional cooperative activity.”

The 2000 amendment by c. 964 and 989 are identical, and also added the paragraph defining “Traditional cooperative activity.”

§ 56-231.39.
Organization and purpose.

Subject to § 56-231.50:1, any utility consumer service cooperative or utility aggregation cooperative may form a cooperative in accordance with this article, either stock or nonstock, not for pecuniary profit, with the exception of for-profit affiliates,
for the purpose of purchasing, generating or transmitting energy products and services for sale or resale, operating or participating in an independent system operator, regional transmission entity, regional power exchange, or
both, and any other lawful purpose, consistent with sound business principles and prudent management practices; (i) provided, however, that within the certificated service territory of any member distribution cooperative that existed
as of January 1, 1999, no such cooperative shall, prior to July 1, 2000, undertake or initiate any new program (a) to buy or maintain an inventory of HVACR equipment or household appliances, (b) to install or service any such equipment
or household appliances for customers, unless such service is not provided by the cooperative but by a third party individual, firm or corporation licensed to perform such service, (c) to sell HVACR equipment or household appliances
to customers who are metered and billed on residential rates, (d) to sell HVACR equipment to customers other than those metered and billed on residential rates except where such sale is an incidental part of providing other energy
services or providing traditional cooperative activities, (e) to sell or distribute propane or fuel oil; sell, install or service propane or fuel oil equipment; or maintain or buy an inventory of propane or fuel oil equipment for
resale, or (f) to serve as a coordinator of nonelectric energy services or provide engineering consulting services except when such energy or engineering services are an incidental part of a marketing effort to provide other energy
or engineering services or as a part of providing services that are traditional cooperative activities; (ii) provided further, that notwithstanding clause (i), such cooperative may, within the certificated service territory of
a specific distribution cooperative that existed as of January 1, 1999, and then only to the extent that such specific distribution cooperative could lawfully do so, engage in any of the activities enumerated in clause (i) that
(a) have received State Corporation Commission approval prior to February 1, 1998, (b) such cooperative is ordered or required to undertake by any jurisdictional court or regulatory authority, (c) were lawfully undertaken prior
to February 1, 1998, (d) are specifically permitted by statute, or (e) are undertaken by any other regulated public service company or its unregulated affiliate within such distribution cooperative’s certificated service territory;
and (iii) also provided that such cooperative or its affiliate may not undertake such activities as are prohibited by clause (i) within the certificated service territory of another public service company unless such activities
are undertaken by such public service company or its unregulated affiliate within the certificated service territory of a specific distribution cooperative existing as of January 1, 1999, and the certificated service territories
of the public service company and the specific distribution cooperative overlap. In addition, such cooperative may establish one or more subsidiaries to engage in any other business activities not prohibited by law. Notwithstanding
the foregoing, no such subsidiary may engage in any business activities that the cooperatives are prohibited from engaging in under this section. For purposes of determining whether a cooperative is formed not for pecuniary profit,
the establishment of one or more affiliates thereof on a for-profit basis shall not disqualify such entity from being formed as a cooperative pursuant to this article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize a cooperative formed pursuant to this article, or any affiliate thereof, to engage, within any political subdivision of the Commonwealth on a not-for-profit basis, in the sale of products, the provision
of services, or other business activity, except for electric power services and traditional cooperative activities. However, if such business activities are not currently provided by any person other than a cooperative formed under
or subject to this chapter or its affiliate and the Commission determines that no such other person is likely, within a reasonable time, to effectively provide such products and services in such political subdivision, an affiliate
of a cooperative may provide such products or services on a not-for-profit basis. The Commission shall also permit an affiliate of a cooperative formed under or subject to this chapter to provide such products or services on a
not-for-profit basis upon a finding that the affiliate will not receive the benefit of any federal income tax exemption that is not available to persons other than cooperatives and will not receive the benefit of any federally
guaranteed or subsidized financing that is not available to persons other than cooperatives; and provided further, that nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the continued operation of any business activities of any not-for-profit
cooperative or affiliate formed, operating, and actively providing products or services to customers on or before July 1, 1999.

History.
1999, c. 874; 2000, cc. 964, 989.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 964 and 989 are identical, and in subsection A, added the subsection A designation and added “Subject to § 56-231.50:1” at the beginning, inserted “with the exception of for-profit affiliates” near the beginning and added the
last sentence; and added subsection B.

§ 56-231.40.
Names.

The words “electric cooperative” or “utility aggregation cooperative” shall not be used in the corporate name of any corporation other than those subject to this chapter, or their wholly owned subsidiaries.

History.
1999, c. 874; 2000, cc. 944, 999.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 944 and 999 are identical, and deleted “formed under or” preceding “subject to.”

§ 56-231.41.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall be entitled “Articles of Incorporation of . . . . . . . . . Cooperative” (the blank space being filled in with the distinguishing part of the name of the cooperative) and shall state:

The name of the cooperative, which name need not contain the word “corporation” or “incorporated,” but shall be such as to distinguish it from any other cooperative;

The location and post office address of its principal office and its registered agent;

The number of directors;

The names and post office addresses of the directors who are to manage the affairs of the cooperative for the first year of its existence, or until their successors are chosen;

The duration of the cooperative if its duration is to be limited; and

In the case of a cooperative incorporating with capital stock, a statement of the maximum and minimum amount of the capital stock of the cooperative, and its division into shares.

The articles of incorporation may also contain any provision not inconsistent with law or the provisions of Title 13.1, which the incorporators may choose to insert for the regulation of the business and the conduct of the affairs of the cooperative;
and any provision as to the plan of financial organization, or relating to the internal regulation or the government of the cooperative, its directors and members; provided, however, that subsections D through G of §

13.1-620

and subdivision 1 of §

13.1-825

shall not apply to any affiliate or subsidiary of a cooperative.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.42.
Bylaws.

The original bylaws of a cooperative shall be adopted by the members of such cooperative. Thereafter, such cooperative’s board shall adopt, amend, or repeal the bylaws unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, subject to the
rights of the members to alter or repeal such bylaws. The bylaws shall set forth the rights and duties of directors, officers and members and other provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of the cooperative not
inconsistent with this article, the cooperative’s articles of incorporation or other applicable law. The bylaws shall contain provisions relative to the disposition of revenues and receipts as may be necessary and appropriate to establish
and maintain the cooperative’s nonprofit character.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.43.
Powers.

Each cooperative formed under this article shall have power to do any and all lawful acts or things, including, but not limited to the power:

To purchase, sell, generate, store, transport or transmit energy, energy services, products and equipment.

To sue and be sued.

To have a seal and alter the same at pleasure.

To acquire, hold and dispose of property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, or interests therein and to pay in cash or property or on credit, and to secure and procure payment of all or any part of the purchase price thereof on such terms and
conditions as the board shall determine.

To render service and to acquire, own, operate, maintain and improve a system or systems.

To accept gifts or grants of money or of property, real or personal, and to accept voluntary and uncompensated services.

To sell, lease, mortgage or otherwise encumber or dispose of all or any parts of its property.

To contract debts, borrow money and to issue or assume the payment of bonds and other obligations.

To fix, maintain and collect reasonable fees, rents, tolls and other charges for service rendered.

To exercise, with respect to its construction of regulated transmission facilities as a power supply cooperative, all the powers set forth in § 56-49, including the power of eminent domain as prescribed for other public service corporations by general
law.

To assist its members, by loans or otherwise, in the acquisition by them of energy and electrical, technological and other equipment related to the business of the cooperative.

To issue nonassessable nonvoting common and preferred capital stock or similar securities and pay dividends thereon.

To perform any and all of the foregoing acts through or by means of its own officers, agents and employees, or by contract.

A cooperative shall have the power and is authorized, from time to time, to issue its obligations for any corporate purpose.

The obligations may be authorized by resolution of the board, and may bear any date or dates, mature at any time or times, bear any interest, be payable at any times, be in any denominations, be in any form, either coupon or registered, carry any registration
privileges, be executed in any manner, be payable in any medium of payment, at any place or places, and be subject to any terms of redemption, as provided by the resolution.

These obligations may be sold in the manner and upon the terms as the board may determine. Pending the preparation or execution of definitive bonds or obligations, interim receipts or certificates of temporary bonds may be delivered to the purchaser of
such obligations.

A cooperative may purchase any of its own obligations.

The Virginia Securities Act (§

13.1-501

et seq.) shall not apply to membership certificates issued by a cooperative or its cooperative affiliates, or subsidiaries organized prior to January 1, 1999.

History.
1999, c. 874; 2000, cc. 944, 999.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 944 and 999 are identical, and in subdivision A 12, inserted “or similar securities” and deleted “noncumulative” preceding “dividends”; deleted “in anticipation of its revenues” following “obligations” in the introductory language
of subsection B; rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “A cooperative shall have the power, out of any funds available, to purchase any of its own obligations. All obligations so purchased shall be canceled.”

§ 56-231.44.
Board of directors.

Each cooperative shall have a board of directors consisting of at least five directors, which shall constitute the governing body of such cooperative. The board, other than those named in the articles of incorporation, shall be elected annually by the
members. The bylaws may provide in lieu of electing the whole number of directors annually, that the directors may be divided into classes and that the terms of office of the several classes need not be uniform. Each director shall
hold office for the term for which he or she is elected and until his or her successor is elected except in cases of ex officio directors.The directors shall be elected by the members of the cooperative. At a minimum, there shall
be at least one director elected from the membership, officers, directors or employees of each member of the cooperative that is itself a cooperative subject to any article of this chapter. Additional directors may be elected from
the membership, from the members, officers, directors or employees of any member of the cooperative, or from employees of the cooperative. The board of directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of the directors.

The board of directors of a cooperative shall have the power to do all things necessary or incidental in conducting the business of such cooperative, including, but not limited to the power:

To adopt and amend bylaws for the management and regulation of the affairs of such cooperative unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, subject to the rights of the members to alter or repeal such bylaws. The bylaws of a cooperative
may make provisions not inconsistent with law or its articles of incorporation, regulating:

The admission, suspension or expulsion of members;

The transfer or classification of membership;

The fees and dues of members and the termination of membership on nonpayment of dues;

The number, times and manner of choosing or electing, qualifications, terms of office, official designations, powers, duties and compensation of its directors and officers;

The filling of a vacancy in the board or in any office;

The number of board members or member-delegates constituting a quorum at meetings;

The date of the annual meeting and the giving of notice thereof and the holding of special meetings and the giving of notice thereof;

The terms and conditions upon which such cooperative is to render service to its members;

The disposition of capital contributions; and

The establishment of classes of membership, the qualifications therefor and the rights and obligations thereof.

2.
To appoint agents and employees and to fix their compensation and the compensation of the officers of the cooperative.

3.
To execute all instruments.

4.
To make its own rules and regulations as to its procedure.

History.
1999, c. 874; 2000, cc. 944, 999.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 944 and 999 are identical, and in the second paragraph of subsection A, added “that is itself a cooperative subject to any article of this chapter” at the end of the second sentence and inserted “from the members” preceding
“officers” in the third sentence.

§ 56-231.45.
Officers.

The officers of a cooperative shall consist of a president, vice-president, secretary and treasurer who shall be elected annually by the board and such other officers as may be designated by the board of directors. No person shall hold any offices unless
that person is a director or employee of the cooperative. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be held by the same person. Any officer may be removed from office and a successor elected or appointed in accordance with such cooperative’s
bylaws.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.46.
Members.

A cooperative may have one or more classes of members. If the cooperative has more than one class of members, the designation of each class and the qualifications and rights of the members of each class shall be set forth in the bylaws of the cooperative.

Such cooperative shall issue to its members nontransferable certificates of membership. Members shall be entitled to vote in accordance with the articles of incorporation or, if the articles of incorporation so provide, the bylaws. The liability of each
member shall be limited to the unpaid portion of its membership fee or subscription to capital stock and its contractual obligations to the cooperative. The equity of members of a nonstock cooperative shall be in proportion to
the patronage capital paid such cooperative.

No person shall become or remain a member unless it has complied with the terms and conditions of membership contained in the bylaws of the cooperative.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.47.
Adoption of article.

Any cooperative of this Commonwealth engaged in the purchase, sale, generation or transmission of electric energy products or services for sale or resale may come under the provisions of this article by filing with the Commission a certificate of adoption
in the manner provided by subsection (b) of §

13.1-334

and relinquishing all rights and powers granted by its former charter.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.48.
Applicability of other laws.

All of the provisions of the Virginia Stock Corporation Act, Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) of Title 13.1, and the Virginia Nonstock Corporation Act (§

13.1-801

et seq.), insofar as not inconsistent with this article, are hereby made applicable to stock and nonstock cooperatives, respectively, when the articles of incorporation are filed in the office of the Commission; provided,
however, that subsections D through G of §

13.1-620

and subdivision 1 of §

13.1-825

shall not apply to any affiliate or subsidiary of a cooperative. A cooperative must have a registered office and a registered agent, pursuant to §

13.1-634

or §

13.1-833

, as appropriate.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.49.
Restructuring costs.

To the extent authorized in this title, a cooperative may recover its costs related to the restructuring of the electric utility industry, including stranded costs and transition costs, from its members through its rates and charges.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.50.
Regulation by State Corporation Commission.

The regulated utility services and operations of any cooperative organized under this article shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission in the same manner and to the same extent as are all other providers of such regulated utility services
under the laws of this Commonwealth; but with regard to sales of energy at wholesale, no cooperative shall be subject to the provisions of §§ 56-234 through 56-245, 56-247 and 56-249 through 56-249.6. With regard to business activities
which are not regulated utility services, no cooperative shall be subject to the provisions of §§ 56-234 through 56-245 and 56-249 through 56-249.6. All other business activities of a cooperative and its affiliates shall be subject
to the jurisdiction of the Commission to the extent provided by § 56-231.50:1 and any other applicable laws of this Commonwealth.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.50:1.
Separation of regulated and unregulated businesses.

No cooperative that engages in a regulated utility service shall conduct any unregulated business activity, other than traditional cooperative activities, except in or through one or more affiliates of such cooperative. No such affiliates, formed to engage
in any business that is not a regulated utility service, shall engage in regulated utility services.

The Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to promote effective and fair competition between (i) affiliates of cooperatives that are engaged in business activities which are not regulated utility services and (ii) other persons engaged in the
same or similar businesses. The rules and regulations shall be effective by July 1, 2000, and shall include provisions:

Prohibiting cost-shifting or cross-subsidies between a cooperative and its affiliates;

Prohibiting anticompetitive behavior or self-dealing between a cooperative and its affiliates;

Prohibiting a cooperative from engaging in discriminatory behavior towards nonaffiliated entities; and

Establishing codes of conduct detailing permissible relations between a cooperative and its affiliates. In establishing such codes, the Commission shall consider, among other things, whether and, if so, under what circumstances and conditions (i) a cooperative
may provide its affiliates with customer lists or other customer information, sales leads, procurement advice, joint promotions, and access to billing or mailing systems unless such information or services are made available
to third parties under the same terms and conditions, (ii) the cooperative’s name, logos or trademarks may be used in promotional, advertising or sales activities conducted by its affiliates, and (iii) the cooperative’s
vehicles, equipment, office space and employees may be used by its affiliates.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed to abrogate or modify the Commission’s authority under Chapter 4 (§ 56-76 et seq.) of this title.

History.
1999, c. 874; 2000, cc. 944, 999.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 944 and 999 are identical, and rewrote the first sentence in subsection A, which formerly read: “Any business of a cooperative that is not a regulated utility service shall be conducted solely by one or more affiliates of such
cooperative.”

§ 56-231.50:2.
Right of action; violation of rules or regulations.

Any person who suffers loss as the proximate result of a violation by a cooperative or its affiliate of any rule or regulation adopted by the Commission pursuant to § 56-231.50:1 shall be entitled to initiate an action to recover actual damages or $500,
whichever is greater, and to obtain injunctive relief. Any action pursuant to this section shall be commenced within two years after its accrual.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in addition to any damages awarded, such person may also be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

In any case arising under this section, no liability shall be imposed upon any cooperative or its affiliate which shows by a preponderance of the evidence that (i) the act or practice alleged to be in violation of any rule or regulation adopted by the
Commission pursuant to § 56-231.50:1 was an act or practice over which the same had no control or (ii) the alleged violation resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid
a violation. However, nothing in this section shall prevent the court from ordering restitution and payment of reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs pursuant to subsection B to any person aggrieved as a result of an unintentional
violation.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.51.
Construction of article and conflicting laws.

This article is to be liberally construed and the enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method or thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods or things, and any provisions of other laws
in conflict with the provisions of this article shall not apply to cooperatives operating hereunder. Any object, purpose, power, manner, method or thing which is not specifically prohibited is permitted.

History.
1999, c. 874.

§ 56-231.52.
Citation to article.

This article may be cited as the “Utility Aggregation Cooperatives Act.”

History.
1999, c. 874.